District of Columbia statutes.
22-1013

Definitions.

In §§ 22-1001 to 22-1009, inclusive, and § 22-1011, the word “animals” or “animal” shall be held to include all living and sentient creatures (human beings excepted), and the words “owner,” “persons,” and “whoever” shall be held to include corporations and incorporated companies as well as individuals.

Aug. 23, 1871, Leg. Assem., p. 138, ch. 106, § 12
June 25, 1892, 27 Stat. 60, ch. 135, § 3
This section is referenced in § 22-1006.
1981 Ed., § 22-813.
1973 Ed., § 22-813.